Vermont, session 2025-2026, H799.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that:
(1) increasing access to postsecondary credentials is critical to
Vermont’s economy and workforce;
(2) the Free Degree Promise Program provides tuition-free community
college degrees to Vermont high school graduates; and
(3) a reliable State funding source should be established to sustain the
Program.
(b) Purpose. The purpose of this act is to codify the Free Degree Promise
Program in statute and designate the Vermont Higher Education Endowment
Trust Fund as an annual funding source for the Program. The goals of the
Program include reducing student debt, increasing degree attainment,
supporting workforce needs, and expanding equitable access to postsecondary
education. With data showing that an associate’s degree in Vermont has the
highest return on investment than anywhere else in the country, a free, fast-
tracked path to an associate’s degree is a smart, targeted investment in
Vermont’s future.
VT LEG #386692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.799
2026 Page 3 of 7
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. chapter 87, subchapter 6 is added to read:
Subchapter 6. Free Degree Promise Program
§ 2871. FREE DEGREE PROMISE PROGRAM
(a) Program established. There is established the Free Degree Promise
Program (Program) to provide financial support to eligible Vermont high
school graduates to complete an accelerated associate’s degree at the
Community College of Vermont (CCV) after completing the CCV Early
College program during their senior year of high school. The Program shall:
(1) cover tuition and fees after any federal and State financial aid;
(2) provide enhanced career and education advising; and
(3) provide stipends to help with books, transportation, and other costs
associated with going to college.
(b) Eligibility. To be eligible for the Free Degree Promise Program, a
student shall:
(1) successfully complete the Early College program at CCV with at
least 20 college credits; and
(2) complete the FAFSA and Vermont Grant application.
(c) Rules. In accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, the Commissioner of
Labor, in consultation with CCV, shall adopt rules to further define Program
eligibility criteria, including residency, graduation year cohorts, academic
VT LEG #386692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.799
2026 Page 4 of 7
requirements, award amounts, enrollment processes, and compliance
requirements consistent with the goals of the Program.
(d) Administration. CCV shall administer the Program, including outreach,
student services, and reporting.
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 2885 is amended to read:
§ 2885. VERMONT HIGHER EDUCATION ENDOWMENT TRUST FUND
* * *
(b) The State Treasurer may invest the monies in the Fund.
(c) In August September of each fiscal year, beginning in the year 2000
2029, the State Treasurer shall withdraw and divide an amount equal to five
percent of the assets equally among the University of Vermont, the Vermont
State Colleges, and the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation. In this
subsection, “assets” means the average of the Fund’s market values at the end
of each quarter for the most recent 12 quarters or all quarters of operation,
whichever is less. Therefore, up to five percent of the Fund assets are hereby
annually allocated pursuant to this section, provided that the amount allocated
shall not exceed an amount that would bring the Fund balance below the initial
funding made in fiscal year 2000 plus any additional contributions to the
principal. The University of Vermont and the Vermont State Colleges shall
use the funds to provide nonloan financial aid to Vermont students attending
their institutions; the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation shall use the
VT LEG #386692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.799
2026 Page 5 of 7
funds to provide nonloan financial aid to Vermont students attending a
Vermont postsecondary institution.
(d)(1) During the first quarter of each fiscal year, the Secretary of
Administration or the Secretary’s designee and the Council created in
subsection (h) of this section may authorize the State Treasurer to make an
amount equal to not more than two three percent of the assets available, in
equal amounts, to the University of Vermont and the, Vermont State Colleges
System, and the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation for the purpose of
creating or increasing a permanent endowment.
(2) In this subsection, “assets” means the average of the Fund’s market
values at the end of each quarter for the most recent 12 quarters or all quarters
of operation, whichever is less. Up to two three percent of the Fund assets are
hereby annually allocated pursuant to this section, provided that the amount
allocated shall not exceed an amount that would bring the Fund balance below
the initial funding made in fiscal year 2000 plus any additional contributions to
the principal. One-half One-third of the amount allocated shall be available to
the University of Vermont and one-half, one-third shall be available to the
Vermont State Colleges System, and one-third shall be available to the
Vermont Student Assistance Corporation. The University of Vermont and the
Vermont State Colleges Each recipient may withdraw funds upon certification
by the withdrawing institution to the Commissioner of Finance and
VT LEG #386692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.799
2026 Page 6 of 7
Management that it has received private donations that are double the amount
it plans to withdraw.
(3) Annually, on or before August 1, the recipients shall render financial
reports on the use of disbursed funds for the preceding fiscal year to the
Treasurer.
* * *
(h) There is created the Vermont Higher Education Endowment Trust Fund
Council to perform the duties set forth in subsections (d) and (e) of this section.
The Council shall be attached to the Office of Treasurer for administration
purposes and shall be composed of the following members:
(1) the Treasurer, who shall be chair;
(1)(2) the President of the University of Vermont;
(2)(3) the Chancellor of the Vermont State Colleges;
(3)(4) the President of the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation;
(4)(5) the President of the Association of Vermont Independent
Colleges;
(5)(6) a representative from the business and industry community,
selected by the Vermont Business Roundtable;
(6)(7) a member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the
Speaker of the House; and
VT LEG #386692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.799
2026 Page 7 of 7
(7)(8) a member of the Senate, appointed by the Committee on
Committees.
Sec. 4. RULEMAKING; IMPLEMNTATION
(a) On or before January 15, 2027, the Commissioner of Labor, pursuant to
3 V.S.A. chapter 25, shall initiate rulemaking for any rules necessary to
implement the Free Degree Promise Program created pursuant to 16 V.S.A.
§ 2871.
(b) The Treasurer shall implement the new allocation beginning in fiscal
year 2029, subject to available Fund balances consistent with the limitations of
16 V.S.A. § 2885.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386692 v.1